Connecticut, session 2026, HB05225.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 21a-70 of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) As used in this section: [(1) "Drugs", "devices" and "cosmetics"
5 have the same meanings as defined in section 21a-92, "wholesaler" or
6 "distributor" means a person, including, but not limited to, a medical
7 device and oxygen provider, a third-party logistics provider, a virtual
8 manufacturer or a virtual wholesale distributor, as such terms are
9 defined in section 20-571, whether within or without the boundaries of
10 the state of Connecticut, who supplies drugs, devices or cosmetics
11 prepared, produced or packaged by manufacturers, to other
12 wholesalers, manufacturers, distributors, hospitals, prescribing
13 practitioners, as defined in section 20-571, pharmacies, federal, state or
14 municipal agencies, clinics or any other person as permitted under
15 subsection (h) of this section, except that: (A) A retail pharmacy or a
16 pharmacy within a licensed hospital that supplies to another such
17 pharmacy a quantity of a noncontrolled drug or a schedule II, III, IV or
LCO 1 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
18 V controlled substance normally stocked by such pharmacies to provide
19 for the immediate needs of a patient pursuant to a prescription or
20 medication order of an authorized practitioner, (B) a pharmacy within a
21 licensed hospital that supplies drugs to another hospital or an
22 authorized practitioner for research purposes, (C) a retail pharmacy that
23 supplies a limited quantity of a noncontrolled drug or of a schedule II,
24 III, IV or V controlled substance for emergency stock to a practitioner
25 who is a medical director of a chronic and convalescent nursing home,
26 of a rest home with nursing supervision, of a hospice inpatient facility
27 licensed pursuant to section 19a-491 or of a state correctional institution,
28 and (D) a pharmacy within a licensed hospital that contains another
29 hospital wholly within such licensed hospital's physical structure that
30 supplies to such contained hospital a quantity of a noncontrolled drug
31 or a schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance normally stocked by
32 such hospitals to provide for the needs of a patient, pursuant to a
33 prescription or medication order of an authorized practitioner, receiving
34 inpatient care on a unit that is operated by the contained hospital, or
35 receiving outpatient care in a setting operated by the contained hospital
36 and such drug or substance is administered on-site by the contained
37 hospital, shall not be deemed a wholesaler under this section; (2)
38 "manufacturer" means (A) a person, whether within or without the
39 boundaries of the state of Connecticut, who produces, prepares,
40 cultivates, grows, propagates, compounds, converts or processes,
41 directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin or
42 by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and
43 chemical synthesis, or who packages, repackages, labels or relabels a
44 container under such manufacturer's own or any other trademark or
45 label any drug, device or cosmetic for the purpose of selling such items,
46 or (B) a sterile compounding pharmacy, as defined in section 20-633b,
47 that dispenses sterile pharmaceuticals without a prescription or a
48 patient-specific medical order; (3) "drug", "device" and "cosmetic" have
49 the same meanings as provided in section 21a-92; and (4)
50 "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer Protection or
51 the commissioner's designee.]
LCO 2 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
52 (1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
53 Protection;
54 (2) "Cosmetic" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-92;
55 (3) "Device" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-92;
56 (4) "Distributor" or "wholesaler" (A) means a person, including, but
57 not limited to, a medical device and oxygen provider, a third-party
58 logistics provider, a virtual manufacturer or a virtual wholesale
59 distributor, as such terms are defined in section 20-571, whether within
60 or without the boundaries of the state of Connecticut, who supplies
61 drugs, devices or cosmetics prepared, produced or packaged by
62 manufacturers to other wholesalers, manufacturers, distributors,
63 hospitals, prescribing practitioners, as defined in section 20-571,
64 pharmacies, federal, state or municipal agencies, clinics or any other
65 person as permitted under subsection (i) of this section, and (B) does not
66 include (i) a retail pharmacy or a pharmacy within a licensed hospital
67 that supplies to another such pharmacy a quantity of a noncontrolled
68 drug or a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance normally stocked
69 by such pharmacies to provide for the immediate needs of a patient
70 pursuant to a prescription or medication order of an authorized
71 practitioner, (ii) a pharmacy within a licensed hospital that supplies
72 drugs to another hospital or an authorized practitioner for research
73 purposes, (iii) a retail pharmacy that supplies a limited quantity of a
74 noncontrolled drug or of a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance
75 for emergency stock to a practitioner who is a medical director of (I) a
76 chronic and convalescent nursing home, (II) a rest home with nursing
77 supervision, (III) a hospice inpatient facility licensed pursuant to section
78 19a-491, or (IV) a correctional institution unless the correctional
79 institution has actual knowledge that the noncontrolled drug or
80 controlled substance will be used to execute a sentence of death imposed
81 by a court, and (iv) a pharmacy within a licensed hospital that contains
82 another hospital wholly within such licensed hospital's physical
83 structure that supplies to such contained hospital a quantity of a
84 noncontrolled drug or a schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance
LCO 3 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
85 normally stocked by such hospitals to provide for the needs of a patient,
86 pursuant to a prescription or medication order of an authorized
87 practitioner, receiving inpatient care on a unit that is operated by the
88 contained hospital, or receiving outpatient care in a setting operated by
89 the contained hospital and such drug or substance is administered on-
90 site by the contained hospital;
91 (5) "Drug" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-92;
92 (6) "Manufacturer" means (A) a person, whether within or without
93 the boundaries of the state of Connecticut, who produces, prepares,
94 cultivates, grows, propagates, compounds, converts or processes,
95 directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin or
96 by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and
97 chemical synthesis, or who packages, repackages, labels or relabels a
98 container under such manufacturer's own or any other trademark or
99 label any drug, device or cosmetic for the purpose of selling such items,
100 or (B) a sterile compounding pharmacy, as defined in section 20-633b,
101 as amended by this act, that dispenses sterile pharmaceuticals without
102 a prescription or a patient-specific medical order; and
103 (7) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited
104 liability company, association or other legal entity.
105 (b) No [wholesaler or manufacturer] person shall operate as [such] a
106 manufacturer or wholesaler until [he] such person has received a
107 certificate of registration issued by the commissioner, which certificate
108 shall be renewed annually, provided no such certificate shall be
109 required of a manufacturer, except a sterile compounding pharmacy, as
110 defined in subsection (a) of section 20-633b, whose principal place of
111 business is located outside the state, who is registered with the federal
112 Food and Drug Administration or any successor agency and who files a
113 copy of such registration with the commissioner. A fee of one hundred
114 ninety dollars shall be charged for each wholesaler's certificate and
115 renewal thereof. A separate certificate and corresponding fee is required
116 for each location existing in this state and for each location existing
LCO 4 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
117 outside of this state that distributes products into this state. The fee for
118 a manufacturer's certificate and renewal thereof shall be two hundred
119 eighty-five dollars for manufacturers employing not more than five
120 licensed pharmacists or qualified chemists or both; three hundred
121 seventy-five dollars for manufacturers employing not more than ten
122 licensed pharmacists or qualified chemists or both; and nine hundred
123 forty dollars for manufacturers employing more than ten licensed
124 pharmacists or qualified chemists or both. No such certificate shall be
125 issued to a manufacturer unless such drugs, devices or cosmetics are
126 manufactured or compounded under the direct supervision of a
127 licensed pharmacist or a qualified chemist. No certificate of registration
128 shall be issued under this section until the applicant has furnished proof
129 satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant is equipped as to
130 facilities and apparatus to properly carry on the business described in
131 his application and that the applicant conforms to chapter 418 and
132 regulations adopted thereunder.
133 (c) The commissioner shall have the right to deny a certificate of
134 registration if [he] the commissioner determines that the issuance of
135 such registration is inconsistent with the public interest. In determining
136 the public interest, the commissioner shall consider, at a minimum, the
137 following factors:
138 (1) Any convictions or regulatory actions involving the applicant
139 under any federal, state or local law relating to drug samples, wholesale
140 or retail drug distribution, or distribution or possession of drugs
141 including controlled substances;
142 (2) Any felony convictions of the applicant under federal, state or
143 local laws;
144 (3) The applicant's past experience in the manufacture or distribution
145 of drugs;
146 (4) The furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in
147 any application made in connection with drug manufacturing or
148 distribution;
LCO 5 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
149 (5) Suspension, revocation or other sanction by federal, state or local
150 government of any license or registration currently or previously held
151 by the applicant for the manufacture or distribution of any drugs;
152 (6) Compliance with licensing or registration requirements under
153 previously granted licenses or registrations;
154 (7) Compliance with requirements to maintain or make available to
155 the commissioner or to federal, state or local law enforcement officials
156 those records required by any federal or state statute or regulation;
157 (8) Failure to provide adequate control against the diversion, theft
158 and loss of drugs;
159 (9) Provision of required security for legend drugs and, in the case of
160 controlled substances, compliance with security requirements for
161 wholesalers set forth in regulations adopted under chapter 420b; [and]
162 (10) Manufacturing, selling or dispensing any drug or device with
163 actual knowledge that the person purchasing or receiving such drug or
164 device directly from the applicant intends to use such drug or device to
165 execute a sentence of death imposed by a court; and
166 [(10)] (11) Compliance with all regulations adopted to enforce the
167 provisions of this section.
168 (d) The commissioner may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a
169 registration, or may issue a letter of reprimand or place a registrant on
170 probationary status, for sufficient cause. Any of the following shall be
171 sufficient cause for such action:
172 (1) The furnishing of false or fraudulent information in any
173 application or other document filed with the commissioner;
174 (2) Any criminal conviction of the registrant under any federal or
175 state statute concerning drugs;
176 (3) The suspension, revocation or other restriction or penalty issued
LCO 6 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
177 against a license or registration related to drugs;
178 (4) Failure to provide adequate control against the diversion, theft
179 and loss of drugs; [or]
180 (5) Manufacturing, selling or dispensing any drug or device with
181 actual knowledge that the person purchasing or receiving such drug or
182 device directly from the registrant intends to use such drug or device to
183 execute a sentence of death imposed by a court; or
184 [(5)] (6) A violation of any provision of any federal or state statute or
185 regulation concerning drugs.
186 (e) The commissioner shall not issue or renew a certificate of
187 registration unless the applicant or registrant seeking such certificate or
188 renewal submits to the commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed
189 by the commissioner, a signed, written statement attesting that such
190 applicant or registrant shall not manufacture, sell or dispense any drug
191 or device with actual knowledge that the person purchasing or receiving
192 such drug or device directly from such applicant or registrant intends
193 to use such drug or device to execute a sentence of death imposed by a
194 court.
195 [(e)] (f) [Wholesalers and manufacturers] Manufacturers and
196 wholesalers shall operate in compliance with applicable federal, state
197 and local statutes, regulations and ordinances, including any applicable
198 laws concerning controlled substances, drug product salvaging or
199 reprocessing.
200 [(f) Wholesalers and manufacturers] (g) Manufacturers and
201 wholesalers shall permit the commissioner, or his authorized
202 representatives, to enter and inspect their premises and delivery
203 vehicles, and to audit their records and written operating procedures, at
204 reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.
205 [(g)] (h) Before denying, suspending, revoking or refusing to renew a
206 registration, or before issuing a letter of reprimand or placing a
LCO 7 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
207 registrant on probationary status, the commissioner shall afford the
208 applicant or registrant an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with
209 the provisions of chapter 54. Notice of such hearing may be given by
210 certified mail. The commissioner may subpoena witnesses and require
211 the production of records, papers and documents pertinent to such
212 hearing.
213 [(h)] (i) No [wholesaler or] manufacturer or wholesaler shall sell any
214 drugs except to the state or any political subdivision thereof, to another
215 manufacturer or wholesaler, to any hospital recognized by the state as a
216 general or specialty hospital, to any institution having a full-time
217 pharmacist who is actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy in such
218 institution not less than thirty-five hours a week, to a chronic and
219 convalescent nursing home having a pharmacist actively engaged in the
220 practice of pharmacy based upon the ratio of one-tenth of one hour per
221 patient per week but not less than twelve hours per week, to a practicing
222 physician, podiatrist, dentist, optometrist or veterinarian, to a licensed
223 pharmacy or a store to which a permit to sell nonlegend drugs has been
224 issued as provided in section 20-624 or to an authorized entity, as
225 defined in section 19a-909, as amended by this act, that has established
226 a medical protocol with a prescribing practitioner pursuant to section
227 19a-909, as amended by this act, provided drugs sold to an authorized
228 entity shall be limited to epinephrine, as defined in section 19a-909, as
229 amended by this act. [The commissioner may adopt such regulations as
230 are necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this section.]
231 [(i)] (j) (1) Each registered manufacturer or wholesaler of drugs shall
232 operate a system to identify suspicious orders of controlled substances
233 and shall immediately inform the Director of the Drug Control Division
234 of suspicious orders. Suspicious orders include, but are not limited to,
235 orders of unusual size, orders deviating substantially from a normal
236 pattern and orders of unusual frequency. Each registered manufacturer
237 or wholesaler of drugs shall also send the Drug Control Division a copy
238 of any suspicious orders submitted to the federal Drug Enforcement
239 Administration pursuant to 21 CFR 1301.74.
LCO 8 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
240 (2) Each registered manufacturer or wholesaler of drugs that, based
241 on concerns of potential diversion, ceases or declines distribution of any
242 schedule II, III, IV or V controlled substance to a pharmacy, as defined
243 in section 20-594, or to a practitioner, as defined in section 21a-316, in
244 the state of Connecticut shall report the name of the pharmacy or
245 practitioner, location of the pharmacy or practitioner and the reasons for
246 ceasing or declining distribution of such controlled substance in writing
247 to the Director of the Drug Control Division, or to an electronic system
248 designated by the Drug Control Division, not later than five business
249 days after ceasing or declining distribution of such controlled substance.
250 (k) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
251 provisions of chapter 54, to administer and enforce the provisions of this
252 section.
253 [(j)] (l) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
254 fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than
255 six months, or both.
256 Sec. 2. Subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 19a-909 of the 2026
257 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
258 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
259 (4) "Authorized entity" means any for-profit or nonprofit entity or
260 organization that employs at least one person with training.
261 "Authorized entity" does not include the state or any political
262 subdivision thereof authorized to purchase epinephrine pursuant to
263 subsection [(h)] (i) of section 21a-70, as amended by this act, a local or
264 regional board of education required to maintain epinephrine pursuant
265 to subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of section 10-212a or a licensed or a
266 certified ambulance service required to be equipped with epinephrine
267 cartridge injectors pursuant to subsection (b) of section 19a-197a.
268 Sec. 3. Section 21a-248 of the general statutes is repealed and the
269 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective June 15, 2026):
270 (a) (1) A licensed manufacturer or wholesaler may sell and dispense
LCO 9 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
271 controlled drugs to any of the following-named persons, but in the case
272 of schedule II drugs only on an official written order or electronically
273 through the Drug Enforcement Agency's Controlled Substance
274 Ordering System: [(1)] (A) To a manufacturer, wholesaler or pharmacist;
275 [(2)] (B) to a physician, dentist or veterinarian; [(3)] (C) to a person in
276 charge of a hospital, incorporated college or scientific institution, but
277 only for use by or in that hospital, incorporated college or scientific
278 institution for medical or scientific purposes; [(4)] (D) to a person in
279 charge of a laboratory, but only for use in that laboratory for scientific
280 and medical purposes; and [(5)] (E) to any registrant as defined in
281 section 21a-240.
282 [(b)] (2) A licensed manufacturer or wholesaler may sell controlled
283 drugs only to registrants when permitted under federal and state laws
284 and regulations.
285 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
286 subsection, no licensed manufacturer or wholesaler shall sell or
287 dispense a controlled drug directly to another person with actual
288 knowledge that such other person intends to use the controlled drug to
289 execute a sentence of death imposed by a court.
290 [(c)] (b) An official order for any schedule I or II drug shall be signed
291 by the person giving such order or by such person's authorized agent
292 and such order shall be presented to the person who sells or dispenses
293 the drug or drugs named therein as provided by federal law. If such
294 order is accepted by such person, each party to the transaction shall
295 preserve such party's copy of such order for a period of three years in
296 such a way so as to be readily accessible for inspection by any public
297 officer or employee engaged in the enforcement of this chapter.
298 [(d)] (c) The manufacturer or wholesaler shall keep records of all sales
299 and dispensing of controlled drugs and shall comply fully with
300 applicable provisions of the federal controlled drug laws and the federal
301 food and drug laws, and the state food, drug and cosmetic laws in such
302 sale or dispensing of controlled drugs.
LCO 10 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
303 [(e)] (d) Possession or control of controlled drugs obtained as
304 authorized by this section shall be lawful only if obtained in the regular
305 course of the business, occupation, profession, employment or duty of
306 the possessor.
307 [(f)] (e) (1) A person in charge of a hospital, incorporated college or
308 scientific institution, or of a laboratory, or in the employ of this state or
309 of any other state, or of any political subdivision thereof, and a master
310 or other proper officer of a ship or aircraft, who obtains controlled drugs
311 under the provisions of this section or otherwise, shall not administer,
312 or dispense, or otherwise use such drugs within this state, except within
313 the scope of such person's, master's or officer's employment or official
314 duty, and then only for scientific or medicinal purposes or for the
315 purposes of research or analysis and subject to the provisions of this
316 chapter.
317 (2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be
318 construed to authorize any person to obtain, administer, dispense or
319 otherwise use a controlled drug to execute a sentence of death imposed
320 by a court.
321 Sec. 4. Subsection (a) of section 20-579 of the general statutes is
322 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
323 1, 2026):
324 (a) The commission may refuse to authorize the issuance of a
325 temporary permit to practice pharmacy, may refuse to authorize the
326 issuance or renewal of a license to practice pharmacy, a license to
327 operate a pharmacy or a registration of a pharmacy intern or pharmacy
328 technician, and may revoke, suspend or place conditions on a license or
329 temporary permit to practice pharmacy, a license to operate a pharmacy,
330 or a registration of a pharmacy intern or a pharmacy technician, and
331 may assess a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars per violation of
332 any provision of this chapter or take other action permitted in
333 subdivision (7) of section 21a-7 if the applicant or holder of the license,
334 temporary permit or registration: (1) Has violated a statute or regulation
LCO 11 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
335 relating to drugs, devices or the practice of pharmacy of this state, any
336 state of the United States, the United States, the District of Columbia, the
337 Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or insular possession
338 subject to the jurisdiction of the United States or a foreign jurisdiction;
339 (2) has been convicted of violating any criminal statute relating to drugs,
340 devices or the practice of pharmacy of this state, any state of the United
341 States, the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth
342 of Puerto Rico, any territory or insular possession subject to the
343 jurisdiction of the United States or a foreign jurisdiction; (3) has been
344 disciplined by, or is the subject of pending disciplinary action or an
345 unresolved complaint before, the duly authorized pharmacy
346 disciplinary agency of any state of the United States, the United States,
347 the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any
348 territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
349 States or a foreign jurisdiction; (4) has been refused a license or
350 registration or renewal of a license or registration by any state of the
351 United States, the United States, the District of Columbia, the
352 Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or insular possession
353 subject to the jurisdiction of the United States or a foreign jurisdiction
354 based on grounds that are similar to grounds on which Connecticut
355 could refuse to issue or renew such a license or registration; (5) has
356 illegally possessed, diverted, sold or dispensed drugs or devices; (6)
357 abuses or excessively uses drugs, including alcohol; (7) has made false,
358 misleading or deceptive representations to the public or the
359 commission; (8) has maintained exclusive telephone lines to, has
360 maintained exclusive electronic communication with, or has exclusive
361 access to computers located in offices of prescribing practitioners,
362 nursing homes, clinics, hospitals or other health care facilities; (9) has
363 substituted drugs or devices except as permitted in section 20-619; (10)
364 has accepted, for return to regular stock, any drug already dispensed in
365 good faith or delivered from a pharmacy, and exposed to possible and
366 uncontrolled contamination or substitution; (11) has accepted, for return
367 to general inventory or regular stock, any drug sold or delivered to a
368 patient, unless accepting such drug for return to general inventory or
369 regular stock is otherwise permitted or required by law; (12) has split
LCO 12 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
370 fees for professional services, including a discount or rebate, with a
371 prescribing practitioner or an administrator or owner of a nursing home,
372 hospital or other health care facility; (13) has entered into an agreement
373 with a prescribing practitioner or an administrator or owner of a nursing
374 home, hospital or other health care facility for the compounding or
375 dispensing of secret formula or coded prescriptions; (14) has performed
376 or been a party to a fraudulent or deceitful practice or transaction; (15)
377 has presented to the commission a diploma, license or certificate
378 illegally or fraudulently obtained, or obtained from a college or school
379 of pharmacy not approved by the commission; (16) has performed
380 incompetent or negligent work; (17) while holding such license,
381 temporary permit or registration, has dispensed or distributed a drug or
382 device directly to another person with actual knowledge that such other
383 person intended to use such drug or device to execute a sentence of
384 death imposed by a court; (18) has falsified a continuing education
385 document submitted to the commission or department or a certificate
386 retained in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of section
387 20-600; [(18)] (19) has permitted a person not licensed to practice
388 pharmacy in this state to practice pharmacy in violation of section 20-
389 605, to use a pharmacist license or pharmacy display document in
390 violation of section 20-608, or to use words, displays or symbols in
391 violation of section 20-609; [(19)] (20) has failed to maintain the entire
392 pharmacy premises, its components and contents in a clean, orderly and
393 sanitary condition; [(20)] (21) has failed to demonstrate adherence to
394 applicable provisions of United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 797,
395 Pharmaceutical Compounding - Sterile Preparations, as amended from
396 time to time; or [(21)] (22) has failed to demonstrate adherence to
397 applicable provisions of United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 795,
398 Pharmaceutical Compounding – Nonsterile Preparations, as amended
399 from time to time.
400 Sec. 5. Subsection (c) of section 20-593 of the general statutes is
401 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
402 1, 2026):
403 (c) The commission shall not grant a renewal license to an applicant
LCO 13 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
404 who (1) has not held a license authorized by the commission within five
405 years of the date of application unless the applicant has passed an
406 examination satisfactory to the commission and has paid the fee
407 required in section 20-601, or (2) within the calendar year preceding the
408 date of application, dispensed or distributed a drug or device directly to
409 another person with actual knowledge that such other person intended
410 to use the drug or device to execute a sentence of death imposed by a
411 court.
412 Sec. 6. Subsection (d) of section 20-613 of the general statutes is
413 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
414 1, 2026):
415 (d) Nothing in sections 20-570 to 20-630, inclusive, shall be construed
416 to (1) prevent a prescribing practitioner from dispensing the prescribing
417 practitioner's own prescriptions to the prescribing practitioner's own
418 patients when authorized within the scope of the prescribing
419 practitioner's own practice and when done in compliance with sections
420 20-14c to 20-14g, inclusive, or (2) authorize a person to dispense or
421 transfer a drug or device directly to another person with actual
422 knowledge that such other person intends to use the drug or device to
423 execute a sentence of death imposed by a court.
424 Sec. 7. Section 20-613a of the general statutes is repealed and the
425 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
426 (a) For the purposes of this section, "electronic questionnaire" means
427 any form in an electronic format that may require personal, financial or
428 medical information from a consumer or patient.
429 (b) In the absence of a documented patient evaluation that includes a
430 physical examination, any request for a controlled substance issued
431 solely on the results of answers to an electronic questionnaire shall be
432 considered to be issued outside the context of a valid practitioner-
433 patient relationship and not be a valid prescription.
434 (c) Any request for a controlled substance to execute a sentence of
LCO 14 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
435 death imposed by a court shall be considered to be issued outside the
436 context of a valid practitioner-patient relationship and not be a valid
437 prescription.
438 (d) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
439 regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, concerning [such] requests
440 for controlled substances. [For the purposes of this section, "electronic
441 questionnaire" means any form in an electronic format that may require
442 personal, financial or medical information from a consumer or patient.]
443 Sec. 8. Subsection (a) of section 20-629 of the general statutes is
444 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
445 1, 2026):
446 (a) The commission may deny, revoke or suspend any certificate of
447 registration as a nonresident pharmacy for:
448 (1) Failure to comply with any requirement of this chapter or chapter
449 420b;
450 (2) Failure to comply with any federal or state statute or regulation
451 concerning drugs or the practice of pharmacy;
452 (3) Delivering in any manner into this state legend drugs or legend
453 devices that are adulterated or misbranded in violation of chapter 418;
454 [or]
455 (4) Delivering a legend drug or legend device directly to another
456 person with actual knowledge that such other person intends to use the
457 legend drug or legend device to execute a sentence of death imposed by
458 a court; or
459 [(4)] (5) Any disciplinary action taken against the nonresident
460 pharmacy by any state or federal agency.
461 Sec. 9. Subsections (d) to (n), inclusive, of section 20-633b of the 2026
462 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
463 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective June 15, 2026):
LCO 15 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
464 (d) (1) A sterile compounding pharmacy may only provide patient-
465 specific sterile pharmaceuticals to patients, to practitioners of medicine,
466 osteopathy, podiatry, dentistry or veterinary medicine, or to an acute
467 care or long-term care hospital or health care facility licensed by the
468 Department of Public Health.
469 (2) If a sterile compounding pharmacy provides sterile
470 pharmaceuticals without a patient-specific prescription or medical
471 order, the sterile compounding pharmacy shall also obtain a certificate
472 of registration from the Department of Consumer Protection pursuant
473 to section 21a-70, as amended by this act, and any required federal
474 license or registration. A sterile compounding pharmacy may prepare
475 and maintain on-site inventory of sterile pharmaceuticals no greater
476 than a thirty-day supply, calculated from the completion of
477 compounding, which thirty-day period shall include the period
478 required for third-party analytical testing, to be performed in
479 accordance with the USP chapters.
480 (3) Nothing in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be
481 construed to authorize a sterile compounding pharmacy to provide a
482 sterile pharmaceutical directly to another person with actual knowledge
483 that such other person intends to use the sterile pharmaceutical to
484 execute a sentence of death imposed by a court.
485 (e) (1) If a sterile compounding pharmacy plans to remodel any area
486 utilized for the compounding of sterile pharmaceuticals or adjacent
487 space, relocate any space utilized for the compounding of sterile
488 pharmaceuticals or upgrade or conduct a nonemergency repair to the
489 heating, ventilation, air conditioning or primary or secondary
490 engineering controls for any space utilized for the compounding of
491 sterile pharmaceuticals, the sterile compounding pharmacy shall notify
492 the Department of Consumer Protection, in writing, not later than forty-
493 five days prior to commencing such remodel, relocation, upgrade or
494 repair. Such written notification shall include a plan for such remodel,
495 relocation, upgrade or repair and such plan shall be subject to
496 department review and approval. If a sterile compounding pharmacy
LCO 16 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
497 makes an emergency repair, the sterile compounding pharmacy shall
498 notify the department of such emergency repair, in writing, not later
499 than twenty-four hours after such repair is commenced.
500 (2) If the USP chapters require sterile recertification after such
501 remodel, relocation, upgrade or repair, the sterile compounding
502 pharmacy shall provide a copy of such sterile compounding pharmacy's
503 sterile recertification to the Department of Consumer Protection not
504 later than five days after the sterile recertification approval. The
505 recertification shall only be performed by an independent licensed
506 environmental monitoring entity.
507 (f) A sterile compounding pharmacy shall report, in writing, to the
508 Department of Consumer Protection any known violation or
509 noncompliance with viable and nonviable environmental sampling
510 testing, as defined in the USP chapters, not later than the end of the next
511 business day after discovering such violation or noncompliance.
512 (g) (1) If a sterile compounding pharmacy initiates a recall of sterile
513 pharmaceuticals that were dispensed pursuant to a patient-specific
514 prescription or medical order, the sterile compounding pharmacy shall
515 notify each patient or patient care giver, the prescribing practitioner and
516 the Department of Consumer Protection of such recall not later than
517 twenty-four hours after such recall was initiated.
518 (2) If a sterile compounding pharmacy initiates a recall of sterile
519 pharmaceuticals that were not dispensed pursuant to a patient-specific
520 prescription or a medical order, the sterile compounding pharmacy
521 shall notify (A) each purchaser of such sterile pharmaceuticals, to the
522 extent such sterile compounding pharmacy possesses contact
523 information for each such purchaser, (B) the Department of Consumer
524 Protection, and (C) the federal Food and Drug Administration of such
525 recall not later than the end of the next business day after such recall
526 was initiated.
527 (h) Each sterile compounding pharmacy shall prepare and maintain
528 a policy and procedure manual. The policy and procedure manual shall
LCO 17 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
529 comply with the USP chapters.
530 (i) Each sterile compounding pharmacy shall report to the
531 Department of Consumer Protection any administrative or legal action
532 commenced against such sterile compounding pharmacy by any state
533 or federal regulatory agency or accreditation entity not later than five
534 business days after receiving notice of the commencement of such
535 action.
536 (j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection (b)
537 of this section, a sterile compounding pharmacy that is a nonresident
538 pharmacy shall submit to the Department of Consumer Protection an
539 inspection report from a government agency with regulatory oversight
540 over such nonresident pharmacy or from a third-party entity with
541 expertise in sterile compounding. Such report shall demonstrate that
542 such nonresident pharmacy is in compliance with the standards
543 required in the most recent United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 797,
544 as amended from time to time. Such nonresident pharmacy shall submit
545 to the department a copy of the most recent inspection report with such
546 nonresident pharmacy's initial nonresident pharmacy application,
547 which inspection report shall be dated by the inspector and evidence
548 that the inspection was performed during the six-month period
549 immediately preceding the submission date of such initial application.
550 Not later than June thirtieth of each even-numbered calendar year
551 following such initial application, such nonresident pharmacy shall
552 submit to the department a new inspection report demonstrating that
553 such nonresident pharmacy remains in compliance with the standards
554 required in the most recent United States Pharmacopeia, Chapter 797,
555 as amended from time to time, which inspection report shall be dated
556 by the inspector and indicate that the inspection was performed not
557 earlier than January first of such even-numbered calendar year.
558 Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a sterile
559 compounding pharmacy that is a nonresident pharmacy shall not be
560 required to submit more than one inspection report during the calendar
561 year after the nonresident pharmacy is issued an initial registration.
LCO 18 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
562 (k) A practitioner, as specified in subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of
563 this section, a hospital or a health care facility that receives sterile
564 pharmaceuticals shall report any errors related to such dispensing or
565 any suspected adulterated sterile pharmaceuticals to the Department of
566 Consumer Protection.
567 (l) (1) For purposes of this subsection, a "designated pharmacist"
568 means a pharmacist responsible for overseeing the compounding of
569 sterile pharmaceuticals and the application of the USP chapters, as said
570 chapters pertain to sterile compounding.
571 (2) Any pharmacy licensed pursuant to section 20-594 that provides
572 sterile pharmaceuticals shall notify the department of such pharmacy's
573 designated pharmacist.
574 (3) The designated pharmacist shall be responsible for providing
575 proof such designated pharmacist has completed a program approved
576 by the commissioner that demonstrates the competence necessary for
577 the compounding of sterile pharmaceuticals, in compliance with all
578 applicable federal and state statutes and regulations.
579 (4) The designated pharmacist shall immediately notify the
580 department whenever such designated pharmacist ceases such
581 designation.
582 (5) Nothing in this section shall prevent a designated pharmacist
583 from being the pharmacy manager.
584 (m) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, (1) the addition
585 of a flavoring agent in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of section
586 20-617a shall be exempt from the requirements of United States
587 Pharmacopeia, Chapter 795, Pharmaceutical Compounding –
588 Nonsterile Preparations, and Chapter 800, Hazardous Drugs, as both
589 may be amended from time to time, and (2) no sterile compounding
590 pharmacy shall sell or transfer a sterile pharmaceutical directly to
591 another person with actual knowledge that such other person intends to
592 use the sterile pharmaceutical to execute a sentence of death imposed by
LCO 19 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5225
593 a court.
594 (n) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
595 regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to implement the provisions
596 of subsections (a) to (m), inclusive, of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 21a-70
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 19a-909(a)(4)
Sec. 3 June 15, 2026 21a-248
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 20-579(a)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 20-593(c)
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 20-613(d)
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 20-613a
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 20-629(a)
Sec. 9 June 15, 2026 20-633b(d) to (n)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(f) and (g), "Wholesalers and manufacturers" was changed
to "[Wholesalers and manufacturers] Manufacturers and wholesalers"
for consistency; and in Section 6(d), "be construed to" was added for
consistency with standard drafting conventions.
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 20 of 20